Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462A.381] AFRICAN AMERICAN WORKFORCE AND AFFORDABLE HOMEOWNERSHIP DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The African American workforce and affordable homeownership development program is established to award homeownership and workforce development grants to cities, Tribal governments, nonprofit organizations, cooperatives created under chapter 308A, 308B, or 308C, and community land trusts created for the purposes outlined in section 462A.31, subdivision 1, for development of affordable homeownership projects targeted to African Americans using African Americans in the workforce. The purpose of the program is to increase the supply of affordable, owner-occupied multifamily or single-family housing throughout the state for African Americans using African Americans as the production workforce. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Use of funds. new text end new text begin (a) Grant funds awarded under this program shall be used for: new text end new text begin (1) land acquisition; new text end new text begin (2) environmental cleanup; new text end new text begin (3) design costs; new text end new text begin (4) rehabilitation costs; new text end new text begin (5) construction training and various job placement activities on projects funded under this section; or new text end new text begin (6) affordable single-family residential housing development. new text end new text begin (b) Grant funds awarded under this program must be used for the following costs associated with targeted African American affordable homeownership and workforce development and utilization: new text end new text begin (1) creating or expanding African American-run business development programs; new text end new text begin (2) creating or expanding African American-run job training programs; new text end new text begin (3) creating or expanding African American-run job placement programs; or new text end new text begin (4) creating or expanding African American-run housing organizations' capacity to participate in the objectives of this section. new text end new text begin (c) A project funded through the grant program shall serve African American households with incomes at or below 80 percent of the state median income. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall develop forms and procedures for soliciting and reviewing applications for grants under this section. The commissioner shall consult with interested stakeholders and African Americans selected by the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage when developing guidelines and procedures for the program. In making grants, the commissioner shall establish semiannual application deadlines when grants may be authorized from available appropriations. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AFRICAN AMERICAN WORKFORCE AND AFFORDABLE HOMEOWNERSHIP DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of housing finance for the African American workforce and affordable homeownership development program as specified in section 1. new text end